Wisconsin, session 2025, SB528.
do enact as follows:SB528,13Section 1. 114.32 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 114.32 (3) (a) and 4amended to read:SB528,2,65114.32 (3) (a) All Except as provided in pars. (b) and (c), all contracts for the 1acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance and, or operation of airports 2and other aeronautical facilities, made that are entered into by the secretary of 3transportation either as the agent of this state or as, the agent of any municipality, 4or as the agent of the owner of a public-use airport, shall be made entered into 5pursuant to the laws of this state governing the making award of like contracts; 6provided, however, that where.SB528,2,147(b) If the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance and, or 8operation of any airport or, landing strip and, or other aeronautical facilities facility 9is financed or partially financed with federal moneys, the secretary of 10transportation, as agent of the state or of any municipality thereof or of the owner of 11a public-use airport, may let shall award contracts in the a manner prescribed 12authorized by the federal authorities, acting under the laws of the United States, 13and any rules or regulations made thereunder, notwithstanding any other state law 14to the contrary.SB528,215Section 2. 114.32 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB528,2,1616114.32 (3) (c) 1. In this paragraph:SB528,2,1917a. “Construction manager at risk contract” means a contract in which the 18construction manager agrees to complete the project within a guaranteed 19maximum price.SB528,2,2220b. “Qualified project” means a project for the construction or improvement of 21a structure, including any paving or sitework necessary for the construction or 22improvement of the structure.SB528,3,2232. The secretary of transportation may enter into contracts under par. (a) for 24qualified projects and, to the extent authorized by federal authorities, under par. (b) 1for qualified projects as construction manager at risk contracts. A construction 2manager under this paragraph need not be selected solely on the basis of price.SB528,3,33